Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Chapter 91. Vermont Telecommunications Authority

§ 8060.
Legislative findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that:

The availability of mobile telecommunications and broadband services is essential for promoting the economic development of the State, the education of its young people and lifelong learning, the delivery of cost-effective health care, the public safety, and the ability of citizens to participate fully in society and civic life.

Private entities have brought mobile telecommunications and broadband services to many households, businesses, and locations in the State. Nevertheless, significant gaps remain in 99 target communities for broadband service, and in community hubs and along the routes which connect them for mobile telecommunications service.

A new level of creative and innovative strategies (including partnerships and collaborations among and between State entities, nonprofit organizations, municipalities, the federal government, and the private sector) is necessary to extend and complete broadband coverage in the State, and to ensure that Vermont maintains a telecommunications infrastructure that allows residents and businesses to compete fairly in the national and global economy.

When such partnerships and collaborations fail to achieve the goal of providing high-quality broadband access and service to all areas and households, or when some areas of the State fall behind significantly in the variety and quality of services readily available in the State, it is necessary for an authority of the State to support and facilitate the construction of infrastructure and access to broadband service through financial and other incentives.

Small broadband enterprises now offering broadband service in Vermont have limited access to financial capital necessary for expansion of broadband service to unserved areas of the State. The General Assembly recognizes these locally based broadband providers for their contributions to date in providing broadband service to unserved areas despite the limitations on their financial resources.

The universal availability of adequate mobile telecommunications and broadband services promotes the general good of the State.

Vermonters should be served by broadband infrastructure that, to the extent practical and cost-effective, uses the best commercially available technology and does not involve widespread installation of technology that becomes outmoded within a short period after installation.

Therefore, it is the goal of the General Assembly to ensure:

that all residences and business in all regions of the State have access to affordable broadband services not later than the end of the year 2013, and that this goal be achieved in a manner that, to the extent practical and cost-effective, does not negatively affect the future installation of the best commercially available broadband technology or result in widespread installation of technology that becomes outmoded within a short period after installation;

the universal availability of mobile telecommunication services, including voice and high-speed data along roadways, and near universal availability statewide;

the investment in telecommunications infrastructure in the State that creates or completes the network for service providers to create last-mile connection to the home or business and supports the best available and economically feasible service capabilities;

that telecommunications and broadband infrastructure in all areas of the State is continuously upgraded to reflect the rapid evolution in the capabilities of available mobile telecommunications and broadband technologies, and in the capabilities of mobile telecommunications and broadband services needed by persons, businesses, and institutions in the State;

the most efficient use of both public and private resources through State policies by encouraging the development of open access telecommunications infrastructure that can be shared by multiple service providers.

The statutory purpose of the exemption for Vermont Telecommunications Authority (VTA) bonds and notes in section 8074 of this title is to lower the cost of borrowing in order to finance the expansion of broadband access across the State.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007; amended

2009, No. 54

, § 50, eff. June 1, 2009;

2011, No. 53

, § 15, eff. May 27, 2011;

2013, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 30;

2013, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 8060a.
Period of dormancy.

On July 1, 2015, the Division for Connectivity established under

3 V.S.A. § 2225

shall become the successor in interest to and the continuation of the Vermont Telecommunications Authority, and the Authority shall cease all operations and shall not resume its duties as specified under this chapter or under any other Vermont law unless directed to do so by enactment of the General Assembly or, if the General Assembly is not in session, by order of the Joint Fiscal Committee. Notwithstanding

32 V.S.A. § 5

, the Joint Fiscal Committee shall issue such order only upon finding that, due to an unforeseen change in circumstances, implementation of the Authority’s capacity to issue revenue bonds or to accept any new gifts, grants, or contributions would be the most effective means of furthering the State’s telecommunications goals and policies. Upon the effective date of such enactment or order, the duties of the Executive Director and the Board of Directors of the Authority shall resume in accordance with chapter 91 of this title and the Director for Connectivity shall be the acting Executive Director of the Authority, until the position is filled pursuant to subsection 8061(e) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. June 16, 2014.

§ 8061.
Establishment of Authority; organization.

The Vermont Telecommunications Authority is hereby created and established as a body corporate and politic and a public instrumentality of the State. The exercise by the authority of the powers conferred upon it in this chapter constitutes the performance of essential governmental functions.

The Authority shall have a Board of Directors of nine members selected as follows:

the State Treasurer or his or her designee;

the Secretary of Administration or his or her designee;

one member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House;

one member of the Senate appointed by the Committee on Committees of the Senate; and

five at-large members appointed by the Governor, who may not be employees or officers of the State at the time of appointment.

The Authority’s powers are vested in the Board of Directors, and a quorum shall consist of five members. No action of the Authority shall be considered valid unless the action is supported by a majority vote of the members present and voting and then only if at least four members vote in favor of the action. The Governor shall select, from among the at-large members, a chair and vice chair, who may not be members of the General Assembly or employees or officers of the State at the time of the appointment.

In making appointments of at-large and legislative members and the Chair, the appointing authorities shall give consideration to citizens of the State with knowledge of telecommunications technology, telecommunications regulatory law, transportation rights-of-way and infrastructure, finance, and environmental permitting. However, the legislative and five at-large members may not be persons with a financial interest in or owners or employees of an enterprise that provides broadband or cellular service or that is seeking in-kind or financial support from the Authority. The conflict of interest provision in this subsection shall not be construed to disqualify a member who has ownership in a mutual fund, exchange traded fund, pension plan, or similar entity that owns shares in such enterprises as part of a broadly diversified portfolio. In addition, at least one at-large member shall represent an area of Vermont determined by the Authority to be unserved by broadband at the time of his or her appointment or reappointment, and at least one at-large member shall represent an area of Vermont determined by the Authority to be unserved by mobile telecommunications at the time of his or her appointment or reappointment. The legislative and at-large members shall serve terms of two years beginning February 1 in odd-numbered years, and until their successors are appointed and qualified. However, three of the five at-large members first appointed by the Governor shall serve an initial term of three years. Vacancies shall be filled by the respective appointing bodies for the balance of the unexpired term. A member may be reappointed for up to three consecutive terms. Upon completion of a term of service for any reason, including the term’s expiration or a member’s resignation, and for one year from the date of such completion, a former Board member shall not advocate before the Authority on behalf of an enterprise that provides broadband or cellular service.

The Authority shall hire and employ an Executive Director who shall serve as the Authority’s chief administrative officer and shall direct and supervise the Authority’s administrative affairs and technical activities in accordance with any rules, regulations, and policies set forth by the Authority. In addition to any other duties, the Executive Director shall:

attend all meetings of the Authority, act as its secretary, and keep minutes of its proceedings;

approve all accounts of the Authority, including accounts for salaries, per diems, and allowable expenses of any employee or consultant thereof and expenses incidental to the operation of the Authority;

make an annual report to the Authority documenting the actions of the Authority and such other reports as the Authority may request;

perform such other duties as may be directed by the Authority in the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter.

Except for those members otherwise regularly employed by the State, the compensation of the Authority’s members shall be the same as that provided by

32 V.S.A. § 1010(a)

. All members of the Authority, including those members otherwise regularly employed by the State, shall receive their actual and necessary expenses when away from home or office upon their official duties.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007; amended

2011, No. 53

, § 16, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 8062.
Purpose; powers and duties.

To achieve the goals under subsection 8060(b) of this title, the Authority is directed:

to provide resources to local, regional, public, and private entities in the form of grants and other incentives funded through bonded capital and other resources;

to inventory and assess the potential to use federal radio frequency licenses held by instrumentalities of the State to enable broadband service in unserved areas of the State; take whatever steps are consistent with the powers granted the Authority under this chapter to promote the use of those licensed radio frequencies for that purpose; and recommend to the General Assembly any further legislative measures with respect to ownership, management, and utilization of these licenses as would promote the general good of the State;

to the extent not inconsistent with the goals of this chapter, to utilize existing buildings and structures, historic or otherwise, as sites for visually-neutral placement of mobile telecommunications and wireless broadband antenna facilities;

to construct and install, or cause to be constructed and installed, fiber optic and wireless infrastructure through grants to providers and through direct investments in infrastructure to be owned by the Authority, in areas needed to meet the State’s objectives as determined by the Secretary of Administration in the action plan developed under

3 V.S.A. § 2222b(b)(3)

, provided that direct investment is not undertaken in areas served by existing providers with comparable levels of broadband quality and speed or mobile telecommunications service; and

to provide technical and such other support as the Secretary of Administration deems necessary.

The Authority shall have the following powers, which shall be exercised to further the Authority’s purpose, and shall have all other powers necessary to carry out the duties imposed on the Authority by law:

To enter into contracts with providers of telecommunications services and related facilities to serve unserved or underserved people and areas of the State; and to provide financial and other assistance to providers who agree in return to provide mobile telecommunications or broadband services to unserved or underserved people and areas of the State; and to facilitate directly or indirectly the efforts of other entities to advance the availability of mobile voice and high speed data or broadband services.

To provide financial assistance in the form of grants or, in accordance with section 8064 of this title, to issue bonds backed by project revenues, the State or its political subdivisions or both for the purpose of building infrastructure capable of delivering mobile telecommunications and broadband services to all Vermonters.

To consult, contract, or partner with the Vermont Economic Development Authority and the Vermont Municipal Bond Bank to provide financial assistance for purposes authorized by this chapter.

To receive and accept grants, gifts, loans, or contributions from any source subject to the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 5

.

To incorporate one or more nonprofit corporations in Vermont to fulfill the goals of this chapter. Such corporations shall be empowered to borrow money and to receive and accept gifts, grants, or contributions from any source, subject to the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 5

, subject to the limitations imposed by law on the Authority. The board of directors of any nonprofit corporation created under this subsection shall be the Board of Directors of the Authority. The corporation shall be organized and operate under the nonprofit corporation laws of the State of Vermont. The Authority may contract with the corporation to provide staff and management needs of the corporation.

To construct, install, own, acquire, sell, trade, and lease equipment, facilities, and other infrastructure that could be accessed and used by multiple service providers, the State, and local governments, including fiber optic cables, towers, shelters, easements, rights-of-way, and wireless spectrum of frequencies; provided that any agreement by the Authority to sell infrastructure that is capable of use by more than one service provider shall contain conditions that will ensure continued shared use or colocation at reasonable rates, and provided that the proposed activity will not be in areas served by existing providers with comparable levels of broadband quality and speed or mobile telecommunications service.

To apply for and obtain required permits for the construction of telecommunications infrastructure.

In collaboration with the Agency of Administration, to lead the marketing of State properties to encourage and expedite collocation of infrastructure.

To consult with agencies and departments on establishing charges or payments for use by wireless telecommunications and broadband service providers of State property, easements, and rights-of-way to the extent such charges or payments are required by law, and establish the criteria for waiver of such charges or payments when providers offer to furnish comparable value to the State to meet the public good.

To sue and be sued in its own name and plead and be impleaded.

To administer its own funds and to invest or deposit funds which are not needed currently to meet the obligations of the Authority.

To borrow money and give other evidence of indebtedness or obligations and security consistent with the Authority’s purpose and needs.

To pursue route and site identification for fiber optic and wireless infrastructure.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to grant power to the Authority to offer the sale of telecommunications services to the public.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007; amended

2011, No. 53

, § 17, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 8063.
Interagency cooperation and assistance.

Other departments and agencies of State government shall assist and cooperate with the Authority and shall make available to it information and data as needed to assist the Authority in carrying out its duties. The Secretary of Administration shall establish protocols and agreements among the Authority and departments and agencies of the State for this purpose. Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive any privilege or protection otherwise afforded to the data and information under exemptions to the public records act or under other laws due solely to the fact that the information or data is shared with the Authority pursuant to this section.

No instrumentality of the State shall sell, lease, or otherwise divest itself of ownership or control of radio frequency spectrum without prior notice to and approval of the General Assembly or, if the General Assembly is not in session, without prior notice to the Chairs of the House Committee on Commerce and Economic Development and the Senate Committees on Finance and on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs and approval of the Joint Fiscal Committee, in consultation with the legislative Chairs already referenced in this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007; amended

2011, No. 53

, § 18, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 8064.
Bonds and notes.

The Authority may issue its negotiable notes and bonds in such principal amount as the Authority determines to be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its corporate purposes, including the payment of interest on notes and bonds of the Authority, establishment of reserves to secure the notes and bonds including the reserve funds created under section 8065 of this title, and all other expenditures of the Authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers. However, the bonds or notes of the Authority outstanding at any one time shall not exceed $34,000,000.00. No bonds shall be issued under this section without the prior approval of the Governor and the State Treasurer or their respective designees. In addition, before the Authority may initially exercise its bonding authority granted by this section, it shall submit to the Emergency Board of the State a current business plan, including an explanation of the bond issue or issues initially proposed.
(a) (1) The Authority may issue its negotiable notes and bonds in such principal amount as the Authority determines to be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its corporate purposes, including the payment of interest on notes and bonds of the Authority, establishment of reserves to secure the notes and bonds including the reserve funds created under section 8065 of this title, and all other expenditures of the Authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers. However, the bonds or notes of the Authority outstanding at any one time shall not exceed $34,000,000.00. No bonds shall be issued under this section without the prior approval of the Governor and the State Treasurer or their respective designees. In addition, before the Authority may initially exercise its bonding authority granted by this section, it shall submit to the Emergency Board of the State a current business plan, including an explanation of the bond issue or issues initially proposed.

The Authority shall have the power, from time to time, to issue bonds and notes, to renew, defease, and refund notes and bonds to pay bonds and notes, including the interest thereon, and, whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of new bonds, whether the bonds and notes to be refunded have or have not matured, and to issue bonds and notes partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any of its corporate purposes.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by resolution of the Authority, every issue of its notes and bonds shall be general obligations of the Authority payable out of any revenues or monies of the Authority, subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular notes or bonds pledging any particular revenues.

The notes and bonds shall be authorized by resolution or resolutions of the Authority, shall bear such date or dates and shall mature at such time or times as the resolution or resolutions may provide, except that no bond shall mature more than 30 years from the date of its issue. The bonds may be issued as serial bonds or as term bonds or as a combination thereof. The notes and bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates or the manner of determining such rate or rates, as provided in

24 V.S.A. §§ 1881-1887

, be in such denominations, be in such form, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places within or outside the State, and be subject to such terms of redemption as the resolution or resolutions may provide; provided, however, that at the time of the authorization of the issuance of such bonds or notes the Authority determines in such resolution that the Authority will derive receipts, revenues, or other income from the facilities or projects to be financed with the proceeds of such bonds or notes sufficient to provide, together with all other available receipts, revenues, and income of the Authority, for the payment of such bonds or notes and the payment of all costs and expenses incurred by the Authority with respect to the program or purpose for which such bonds or notes are issued and all other expenses of the Authority incurred under this title. The notes and bonds of the Authority may be sold by the Authority at public or private sale, at such price or prices as the Authority shall determine.

Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any notes or bonds or any issue thereof may contain provisions, which shall be a part of the contract or contracts with the holders thereof, as to:

pledging all or any part of the revenues of the Authority to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue thereof, subject to such agreements with note holders or bondholders as may then exist;

pledging all or any part of the assets of the Authority to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue of notes or bonds, subject to such agreements with note holders or bondholders as may then exist;

the use and disposition of the revenues of the Authority and payments upon other obligations held by the Authority;

the setting aside of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation and disposition thereof;

limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of notes or bonds may be applied and pledging the proceeds to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue thereof;

limitations on the issuance of additional notes or bonds; the terms upon which additional notes or bonds may be issued and secured; and the refunding of outstanding or other notes or bonds;

the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with note holders or bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of notes or bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which consent may be given;

limitations on the amount of monies to be expended by the Authority for operating expenses of the Authority;

vesting in a trustee or trustees, within or outside the State, such property, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the Authority may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee appointed by the bondholders pursuant to this chapter and limiting or abrogating the right of the bondholders to appoint a trustee under this chapter or limiting the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee;

defining the acts or omissions to act that shall constitute a default in the obligations and duties of the Authority to the holders of the notes or bonds and providing for the rights and remedies of the holders of the notes or bonds in the event of such default, including as a matter of right the appointment of a receiver; provided, however, that the rights and remedies shall not be inconsistent with the general laws of the State and other provisions of this chapter; and

any other matters, of like or different character, which in any way affect the security or protection of the holders of the notes or bonds.

Any pledge made by the Authority shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the revenues, monies, or property so pledged and thereafter received by the Authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act; and such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the Authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.

Bonds, notes, and other obligations authorized under this chapter may, in the discretion of the Authority, be issued with such terms as will cause the interest thereon to be subject to federal income taxation. To the extent required for the sale of the obligations, the Authority may register such obligations under applicable federal and state securities laws. No person executing any bonds, notes, and other obligations issued by the Authority or others under authority of this chapter shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof. The Authority shall indemnify any person who shall have served as a member, officer, or employee of the Authority against financial loss or litigation expense arising out of or in connection with any claim or suit involving allegations that pecuniary harm has been sustained as a result of any transaction authorized by this chapter, unless such person is found by a final judicial determination not to have acted in good faith and for a purpose that the person reasonably believed to be lawful and in the best interest of the Authority.

The Authority, subject to such agreements with note holders or bondholders as may then exist, shall have power out of any funds available therefore to purchase notes or bonds of the Authority, which shall thereupon be cancelled, at a price not exceeding:

if the notes or bonds are then redeemable, the redemption price then applicable plus accrued interest to the next interest payment thereon; or

if the notes or bonds are not then redeemable, the redemption price applicable on the first date after such purchase upon which the notes or bonds become subject to redemption plus accrued interest to such date.

In the discretion of the Authority, the notes or bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the Authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the power of a trust company within or outside the State. The trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the note holders or bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the Authority in relation to the exercise of its corporate powers and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all monies. The Authority may provide by such trust indenture for the payment of the proceeds of the notes or bonds and the revenues to the trustee under such trust indenture or other depository and for the method of disbursement thereof, with such safeguards and restrictions as it may determine. All expenses incurred in carrying out the trust indenture may be treated as a part of the operating expenses of the Authority. If the notes or bonds shall be secured by a trust indenture, the note holders and bondholders shall have no authority to appoint a separate trustee to represent them.

Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, a bond or note issued under this chapter is fully negotiable for all purposes of 9A V.S.A. § 1-101 et seq., and each holder or owner of a bond or note or of any coupon appurtenant thereto, by accepting the bond or note or coupon, shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that the bond, note, or coupon is fully negotiable for those purposes.

Any provision of this chapter or of any other law or any recitals in any bonds or notes issued under this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, all bonds, notes, and interest coupons appertaining thereto issued by the Authority shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents, including negotiability, of investment securities under sections 9A V.S.A. § 1-101 et seq., but no provision of those sections respecting the filing of a financing statement to perfect a security interest shall be applicable to any security interest created in connection with the issuance of the bonds, notes, or coupons.

In case any of the members, Executive Director, or officers of the Authority whose signatures appear on any notes or bonds or coupons shall cease to be members, Executive Director, or officers before the delivery of such notes or bonds, the signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such members, Executive Director, or officers had remained in office until such delivery.

The Authority may enter into one or more agreements for the exchange of interest rates, cash flows, or payments to reduce net borrowing costs, to achieve desirable net effective interest rates in connection with its issuance and sale of debt obligations, and to provide for an efficient means of debt management.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007; amended

2019, No. 79

, § 18, eff. June 20, 2019.

§ 8065.
Reserve funds.

The Authority may create and establish one or more special funds, herein referred to as “debt service reserve funds,” and shall pay into each such debt service reserve fund:

any monies appropriated and made available by the State for the purpose of such fund;

any proceeds of the sale of notes or bonds, to the extent provided in the resolution or resolutions of the Authority authorizing the issuance thereof; and

any other monies which may be made available to the Authority for the purpose of such fund from any other source or sources.

All monies held in any debt service reserve fund, except as hereinafter provided, shall be used, as required, solely for the payment of the principal of bonds secured in whole or in part by such fund or of the sinking fund payments hereinafter mentioned with respect to such bonds, the purchase or redemption of such bonds, the payment of interest on such bonds, or the payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when such bonds are redeemed prior to maturity; provided, however, that monies in any such fund shall not be withdrawn therefrom at any time in such amount as would reduce the amount of such fund to less than the debt service reserve requirement established by resolution of the Authority for such fund as hereafter provided except for the purpose of making with respect to bonds secured in whole or in part by such fund payments, when due, of principal, interest, redemption premiums, and the sinking fund payments hereinafter mentioned for the payment of which other monies of the Authority are not available. Any income or interest earned by, or increment to, any debt service reserve fund due to the investment thereof may be transferred by the Authority to other funds or accounts of the Authority to the extent it does not reduce the amount of such debt service reserve fund below the debt service reserve requirement for such fund.

The Authority shall not at any time issue bonds or notes secured in whole or in part by a debt service reserve fund if upon the issuance of such bonds or notes the amount in such debt service reserve fund will be less than the debt service reserve requirement established by resolution of the Authority for such fund, unless the Authority at the time of issuance of such bonds shall deposit in such fund from the proceeds of the bonds or notes so to be issued, or from other sources, an amount that, together with the amount then in such fund, will not be less than the debt service reserve requirement established for such fund. The debt service reserve requirement for any debt service reserve fund shall be established by resolution of the Authority prior to the issuance of any bonds or notes secured in whole or in part by such fund and shall not be required to exceed “maximum debt service.” For the purposes of this section, the term “maximum debt service” shall mean, as of any particular date of computation, an amount of money equal to the greatest of the respective amounts, for the then current or any future fiscal year of the Authority, of annual debt service on the bonds of the Authority secured or to be secured in whole or in part by such debt service reserve fund, such annual debt service for any fiscal year being the amount of money equal to the aggregate of:

all interest payable during such fiscal year on all bonds secured in whole or in part by such debt service reserve fund outstanding on the date of computation; plus

the principal amount of all such bonds outstanding on such date of computation that mature during such fiscal year; plus

all amounts specified in any resolution of the Authority authorizing such bonds as payable during such fiscal year as a sinking fund payment with respect to any of such bonds that mature after such fiscal year.

In computing the amount of the debt service reserve funds for the purpose of this section, securities in which all or a portion of such funds shall be invested shall be valued at par if purchased at par or at amortized value, as such term is defined by resolution of the Authority, if purchased at other than par.

In order to assure the maintenance of the debt service reserve requirement in each debt service reserve fund established by the Authority, there may be appropriated annually and paid to the Authority for deposit in each such fund such sum as shall be certified by the Chair of the Authority to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House as is necessary to restore each such debt service reserve fund to an amount equal to the debt service reserve requirement for such fund. The Chair shall annually, on or about February 1, make and deliver to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House his or her certificate stating the sum required to restore each such debt service reserve fund to the amount aforesaid, and the sum so certified may be appropriated, and if appropriated, shall be paid to the Authority during the then current State fiscal year. The principal amount of bonds or notes outstanding at any one time and secured in whole or in part by a debt service reserve fund to which State funds may be appropriated pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed $40,000,000.00, provided that the foregoing shall not impair the obligation of any contract or contracts entered into by the Authority in contravention of the Constitution of the United States of America.

The Authority shall create and establish such other fund or funds as may be necessary or desirable for its corporate purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007.

§ 8066.
Refunding obligations — Issuance and sale.

The Authority may provide for the issuance of refunding obligations for the purpose of refunding any obligations then outstanding that have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such obligations and for any corporate purpose of the Authority. The issuance of such obligations, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the Authority in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter that relate to the issuance of obligations, insofar as those provisions may be appropriate.

Refunding obligations issued as provided in this section may be sold or exchanged for outstanding obligations issued under this chapter and, if sold, the proceeds thereof may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption, or payment of such outstanding obligations. Pending the application of the proceeds of any refunding obligations, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal, accrued interest and any redemption premium on the obligations being refunded, and, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such refunding obligations or in the trust agreement securing them to the payment of any interest on such refunding obligations and any expenses in connection with such refunding, such proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America, and which shall mature or which shall be subject to redemption by the holders thereof, at the option of such holders, not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon will be required for the purposes intended.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 79

, § 1, eff. June 9, 2007.